Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.023

Commission may establish foundation.

A commodity commission may establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money when the foundation benefits the commodity for which the commission was established. Commission funds may be used for the purposes authorized in the marketing order.

[ 2001 c 315 s 8.]